Hawaii statutes.
§651-96 After sale, money equal to real
property exemption protected. The money paid to the defendant as the
defendant's exemption shall be entitled, for the period of six months
thereafter, to the same protection against attachment and execution which section
651-92 gives to the real property. If the defendant, within such six-month
period, applies such proceeds to the purchase of real property, the date of
such acquisition and commencement of residence for the purpose of section
651-92(b)(5), shall be considered to be the date of the acquisition of interest
in and commencement of residence on the real property whose sale resulted in
such proceeds. [L 1976, c 136, pt of §1; am L 1978, c 46, §10; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next